Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 37.5
FOREIGN CAPITAL DEPOSITORIES

11-37.5-101 to 11-37.5-503. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article repealed, (HB 09-1053), ch. 159, p. 687, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1999. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2009, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.